Arkansas statutes. Title 25 State Government
Chapter 4 Division of Information Systems
The 2019 amendment, in the introductory language of (a), inserted “is a cabinet-level department and”, substituted “Secretary” for “Director”, and added “and those state entities transferred to the Department of Human Services pursuant to a cabinet-level department transfer under §25-43-902”; added “of the Department of Human Services” at the end of (a)(1); deleted former (6) and redesignated former (7)-(9) as(6)-(8); substituted “Secretary’s Office of the Department of Human Services” for “Director’s Office of the Department of Human Services” in the introductory language of (b); substituted “Secretary” and “secretary” for “Director” and “director” in (b)(1), (b)(2), and in (c)(1)(A)-(C); substituted “Board of Developmental Disabilities Services and the Department of Human Services State Institutional System Board” for “boards” in (c)(2)(B); and deleted (c)(3).

Cross References. Division of Youth Services, §9-28-201 et seq.

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning mental health services under the direction of the State Hospital Board, was repealed by Acts 1995, No. 1261, § 18. The section was derived from Acts 1985, No. 348, §§ 2, 8; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 5-902, 5-912c; Acts 1993, No. 410, § 3.

It is the intent of this section that the administration of the human development centers located at Arkadelphia, Booneville, Conway, Jonesboro, and the Southeast Arkansas Human Development Center at Warren, and the various facilities and services thereof, shall be under the control of the Board of Developmental Disabilities Services, as provided and intended by Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 33, but the board shall exercise its control in accordance with the general guidelines, policies, and rules of the department governing divisions, offices, sections, or units within the department with respect to budgets, personnel and personnel policies, records, purchasing, bookkeeping, and other administrative procedures prescribed by the secretary.

It is the intent of this act that the Board of Developmental Disabilities Services shall devote its time and resources to the operation and management of the state-owned and controlled institutional programs of the various state human development centers and that the establishment and operation of community programs, workshops, and other services for individuals with developmental disabilities or individuals with intellectual disabilities in this state and other regional and community services benefiting individuals with developmental disabilities or individuals with intellectual disabilities shall be administered by the department through the divisions, offices, sections, or units of the department as determined by the secretary.

Nothing in this act shall be construed to prevent community providers from making determinations consistent with guidelines and criteria established by the state with respect to the appropriate placement of eligible individuals with developmental disabilities or individuals with intellectual disabilities in the least restrictive setting and the development of individual program plans for instructional and case management functions for individuals with developmental disabilities or individuals with intellectual disabilities, in keeping with the requirements of regulations promulgated pursuant to the Education for All Handicapped Children Act of 1975, Pub. L. No. 94-142, and § 504 of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973, Pub. L. No. 93-112.

The state reserves the authority to make final determination of eligibility for services funded, in whole or in part, by state and federal funds.

Publisher's Notes. Acts 1985, No. 348, § 3, provided, in part, that all functions vested in the Board of Developmental Disabilities Services with respect to community programs, workshops, and other services for individuals with developmental disabilities or individuals with intellectual disabilities and all other duties, programs, or services under the board's jurisdiction, except those specified in subsection (a) of this section, were transferred to the Department of Human Services to be performed by the divisions, offices, etc., designated by the director of the department. The section specifically transferred to the department the powers and duties granted the board under §§20-48-207 —20-48-209,20-48-211, and20-48-301 —20-48-305.

As to transfer of Board of Developmental Disabilities Services to Department of Human Services, see Publisher's Notes to §25-10-101.

Acts 1971, No. 38, § 12, transferred the Arkansas Board of Mental Retardation (now the Board of Developmental Disabilities Services) and the Arkansas Children's Colonies (now human development centers) to the Department of Social and Rehabilitative Services (now Department of Human Services) by a type 1 transfer.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment by No. 315 substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (d)(1).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Secretary of the Department of Human Services” for “Director of the Department of Human Services” in (b); in (d)(1), deleted “Alexander” preceding “Arkadelphia” and substituted “secretary” for “director”; and substituted “secretary” for “director of the department” at the end of (d)(2).

Meaning of “this act”. Acts 1985, No. 348, referred to in this section, is codified as §§20-46-202 [repealed],20-46-301,25-2-104,25-2-105,25-2-107,25-10-102,25-10-103 [repealed],25-10-104,25-10-105 [repealed],25-10-106,25-10-108,25-10-109,25-10-111,25-10-113,25-10-115, and25-10-116.

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning the Arkansas Youth Services Board, was repealed by Acts 1995, No. 1261, § 18. The section was derived from Acts 1985, No. 348, §§ 4, 8; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 5-902, 5-912e.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment by No. 315 deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (b)(2).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Secretary of the Department of Human Services” for “Director of the Department of Human Services” in (a)(1) and (2); substituted “shall employ” for “shall appoint” in (a)(1); substituted “Department of Human Services State Institutional System Board and the Board of Developmental Disabilities Services” for “respective boards” in (b)(1); and, in (b)(2), substituted “the Department of Human Services State Institutional System Board and the Board of Developmental Disabilities Services” for “those boards”, substituted “institutions of the Department of Human Services State Institutional System Board and the Board of Developmental Disabilities Services” for “boards of those institutions”, and substituted “Secretary of the Department of Human Services” for “Director of the Department of Human Services”.

Meaning of “this act”. See note to §25-10-104.

Cited: Drake v. Scott, 812 F.2d 395, 1987 U.S. App. LEXIS 2354 (8th Cir. 1987); Drake v. Scott, 823 F.2d 239 (8th Cir. 1987).

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “Director's Office” for “Division of Administrative Services” throughout the section; and redesignated (b) as (b)(1) and (2).

The 2019 amendment substituted “Secretary’s Office of the Department of Human Services” for “Director’s Office of the Department of Human Services” in (a).

History.

Acts 2007, No. 751, § 22; 2013, No. 1458, § 2; 2019, No. 910, § 3573.